New Jersey, session 222, A5562.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-204) is amended to read as follows: 1.    [The phrase] As used in sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-205 and C.39:4-206), person with a disability means: a.     any person who has lost the use of one or more limbs as a consequence of paralysis, amputation, or other permanent disability or who has been diagnosed with an autonomic dysfunction disorder, adrenal insufficiency, or a permanent disability as to be unable to ambulate without the aid of an assisting device or whose mobility is otherwise limited as certified by:  a physician with a plenary license to practice medicine and surgery in this State or a bordering State; a podiatrist licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; a physician stationed at a military or naval installation located in this State who is licensed to practice in any state; a chiropractic physician licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; a physician assistant licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; or a nurse practitioner licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; or b.    any citizen and resident of this State who was honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who is adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, as being permanently 100 percent disabled. (cf:  P.L.2017, c.166, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.